California, session 20252026, AB2303.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33318.3 is added to the Education Code, to read:33318.3. (a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(1) The multiplicity of procedures, portals, and timelines for submission of required compliance and expenditure reports and plans by local educational agencies imposes burdens on the time, human resources, and funding of public schools.(2) Better aligned and coherent reporting mechanisms and methodologies will reduce these burdens, result in more complete, uniform, and quality data, and further the purposes of the statewide system of support.(b) The purpose of this section is to accomplish both of the following goals:(1) Reduce the duplication and burden of reporting requirements required plans and reports on local educational agencies.(2) Improve coherence in the statewide system of support and the quality and utility of information.(c) In order to accomplish the goals specified in subdivision (b), the Legislative Analyst’s Office, shall do Office shall prepare a report that includes recommendations for all of the following:(1)Review existing required reports and planning documents, including, but not limited to, the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System and the reporting requirements of a local control and accountability plan.(2)Review reporting deadlines for local educational agencies across and within state agencies, departments, and offices.(3)(A)Prepare a report that includes all of the following:(i)Recommendations to reduce and remove conflicting(1) Reducing and removing conflicting or redundant reports and reporting deadlines to allow local educational agencies sufficient time to plan, prepare for, and meet the reporting requirements.(ii)(I)Recommendations for a(2) (A) A statewide data submission portal that would allow a local educational agency to enter reporting plan or report information once, and that could be used to generate autopopulate fields of multiple reports. plans or reports, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(i) The data fields that should be included in the portal.(ii) The reports that could be populated by data in the portal.(iii) Which state entities are best suited to create, host, and maintain the portal.(II)(B) In preparing the recommendations pursuant to						subclause (I), subparagraph (A), the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall confer with the department and other state agencies that operate similar data portals or may be able to create a data portal and shall research data submission portals in use in other states.(iii)(3) A statewide reporting calendar that identifies all the deadlines recommended for retention pursuant to clause (i). of all plans and reports required to be submitted by local educational agencies. These recommendations shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) The content that should be included in the calendar.(B) Which entities are best suited to create, host, and maintain the calendar.(C) The frequency and methods that should be used to update the calendar.(B)(d) In preparing the report described in subparagraph (A), subdivision (c), the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall solicit and incorporate feedback from statewide organizations, including, but not limited to, organizations representing the following:(i) School boards.(ii) County offices of education.(iii) School administrators.(iv) School business officers.(v) Small school districts.(vi) Medium-sized school districts.(vii) Large school districts.(viii) Labor unions.(d)(e) (1) On or before July 1, 2027, January 1, 2028, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall submit the report prepared pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) to the appropriate budget and policy committees of the Legislature and to the Governor.(2) The report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with section 9795 of the Government Code.(e)On or before July 1, 2028, and on or before July 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall update the statewide reporting calendar.(f) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.